Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
is unreasonable for such utility, in which case the Commission may utilize a debt to equity ratio that it finds to be reasonable for such utility in determining any rate adjustment pursuant to subdivisions 8 a and c, and without regard
to the cost of capital, capital structure, revenues, expenses or investments of any other entity with which such utility may be affiliated. In particular, and without limitation, the Commission shall determine the federal and state
income tax costs for any such utility that is part of a publicly traded, consolidated group as follows: (i) such utility’s apportioned state income tax costs shall be calculated according to the applicable statutory rate, as if the
utility had not filed a consolidated return with its affiliates, and (ii) such utility’s federal income tax costs shall be calculated according to the applicable federal income tax rate and shall exclude any consolidated tax liability
or benefit adjustments originating from any taxable income or loss of its affiliates.

History.
2007, cc. 888, 933; 2008, c. 476; 2009, c. 824; 2011, cc. 236, 367, 371, 380, 382; 2012, c. 435; 2013, c. 2; 2014, cc. 212, 541, 548, 550; 2015, cc. 37, 599; 2016, c. 3; 2017, cc. 246, 564, 583, 820; 2018, cc. 296, 795;
2019, cc. 535, 741, 773; 2020, cc. 662, 799, 801, 1108, 1190, 1193, 1194; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 327.

Cross references.

As to electric utility integrated resource planning, see Chapter 24 (§ 56-597 et seq.) of Title 56.

As to closure of certain coal combustion residuals units, see § 10.1-1402.04.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 568, provides: “That it is in the public interest, and is consistent with the energy policy goals in § 67-102 of the Code of Virginia, to promote cost-effective conservation of energy through
fair and effective demand side management, conservation, energy efficiency, and load management programs, including consumer education. These programs may include activities by electric utilities, public or private organizations, or
both electric utilities and public or private organizations. The Commonwealth shall have a stated goal of reducing the consumption of electric energy by retail customers through the implementation of such programs by the year 2022
by an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of electric energy consumed by retail customers in 2006. The State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall conduct a proceeding to (i) determine whether the 10 percent electric energy
consumption reduction goal can be achieved cost-effectively through the operation of such programs and, if not, determine the appropriate goal for the year 2022 relative to the base year of 2006; (ii) identify the mix of programs that
should be implemented in the Commonwealth to cost-effectively achieve the defined electric energy consumption reduction goal by 2022, including but not limited to demand side management, conservation, energy efficiency, load management,
real-time pricing, and consumer education; (iii) develop a plan for the development and implementation of recommended programs, with incentives and alternative means of compliance to achieve such goals; (iv) determine the entity or
entities that could most efficiently deploy and administer various elements of the plan; and (v) estimate the cost of attaining the energy consumption reduction goal. The Commission shall, on or before December 15, 2007, submit its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly, which shall include recommendations for any additional legislation necessary to implement the plan to meet the energy consumption reduction goal. In developing a plan
to meet the goal, the Commission may consider providing for a public benefit fund and shall consider the fair and reasonable allocation by customer class of the incremental costs of meeting the goal that are recovered in accordance
with subdivision A 5 b of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. The Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, in consultation with the staff of the Commission, shall submit, as part of the annual report required under § 67-202.1 of the
Code of Virginia, an assessment of the progress the Commonwealth is making toward meeting the goal of reducing the consumption of electric energy by retail customers by the year 2022 by an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of
electric energy consumed by retail customers in 2006 through the implementation of demand side management, conservation, energy efficiency, and load management programs, including consumer education, and submit the report to the Governor’s
Executive Committee on Energy Efficiency and to the Governor and General Assembly as required by § 67-202.1 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 4, provide: “That the Department of Taxation shall (i) conduct an analysis of the potential implications of the provisions of this act, as compared to previous law, on the system of taxation of the Commonwealth and the
revenues generated thereby, and (ii) report its findings and any recommendations with respect thereto to the Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring by November 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 6, provide: “That the Office of Attorney General, in consultation with the State Corporation Commission, shall submit annual reports to the Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring on or before November 1, 2007, and
November 1, 2008, in which it shall identify, and recommend appropriate corrective legislation to address, any issues that may impede the implementation of the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 7, provide: “That the State Corporation Commission, in consultation with the Office of Attorney General, shall submit a report to the Governor and General Assembly by November 1, 2012, and every five years thereafter, assessing
the rates and terms and conditions of incumbent electric utilities in the Commonwealth. Such report shall include an analysis of, among other matters, the amount, reliability and type of generation facilities needed to serve Virginia
native load compared to that available to serve such load, and provide a comparison of such utilities to those in the peer group of such utilities that meet the criteria enumerated in subdivision A 2 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2009, c. 824, cl. 2, provides: “That each utility consumer services cooperative (cooperative) organized or operated pursuant to Article 1 ( § 56-231.15 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1 of Title 56 of the Code of Virginia shall, on or before October 31, 2009,
file with the State Corporation Commission (Commission) an assessment of the statutory, regulatory, organizational, physical, contractual, financial, and market impediments to cooperative implementation of initiatives relating to dynamic
rates, standby rates, interruptible rates, and rates for purchases of electricity generated from renewable sources. Each cooperative shall conduct its assessment and submit such assessment individually, collectively with one or more
other cooperatives, or collectively through an association of cooperatives. The Commission shall review each assessment to evaluate its accuracy and completeness. On or before December 1, 2009, the Commission shall forward each assessment
to the Governor and the General Assembly along with the Commission’s evaluation of the accuracy and completeness of each report.”

Acts 2011, c. 771, provides: “§ 1. That in order to promote solar energy through distributed generation, the State Corporation Commission shall exercise its existing authority to consider for approval, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity
for hearing, petitions filed by a utility to construct and operate distributed solar generation facilities and to offer special tariffs to facilitate customer-owned distributed solar generation as alternatives to net energy metering,
with an aggregate amount of rated generating capacity of up to 0.20 percent of each electric utility’s adjusted Virginia peak load for the calendar year 2010. Such petitions may be made during the period of July 1, 2011, through July
1, 2015, and the Commission, on its own motion, may extend this period an additional year for good cause. Each distributed solar generation installation approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be part of a demonstration
program to assess benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high load growth circuits, for a period of five years from the date each installation becomes operational. Thereafter each installation shall
cease to be part of a demonstration program and, in the case of a utility-owned installation, shall continue to operate as a utility-owned generating facility, and in the case of a customer-owned installation, shall continue to provide
power to the utility pursuant to the terms of the agreed upon tariff arrangement. Subject to review by the Commission, such utility-owned distributed solar generation facilities and tariffs for power generated from customer-owned distributed
solar installations shall be prioritized in areas identified by the utility as areas where localized solar generation would provide benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high-growth areas. The Commission
shall approve such programs or distributed generation facilities if it determines that the programs or facilities, including those targeting constrained or high load growth areas, are reasonably designed to be in furtherance of the
public interest.

“§ 2. A utility participating in demonstration programs pursuant to § 1 of this act shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that at least four of the distributed solar installation sites included in the demonstration projects shall be in a community setting,
which shall include, but not be limited to, to the extent permitted by law, participation by local governments, schools, community associations, neighborhood associations, or nonprofit organizations. The capacity of each such community
installation shall not exceed 500 kilowatts.

“§ 3. When a utility proposes solar distributed generation resources as permitted in § 1 of this act comprised of multiple installations combined collectively, the Commission shall consider such projects as one small non-combustible renewable power generation
facility for purposes of project approval pursuant to §§ 10.1-1197.5, 10.1-1197.8, 56-265.2, 56-580 and 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. A ‘small non-combustible renewable power generation facility’ is a small renewable energy project
that generates electricity from sunlight and may consist of one or more installations distributed on separate structures or facilities, whether such installations are treated each as a stand-alone small renewable energy project or
are combined and treated collectively as one small renewable energy project.

“§ 4. The Commission shall provide annual reports on any demonstration programs approved pursuant to this act to the Governor and the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”

Acts 2013, c. 2, cl. 2 provides: “That unless otherwise specified, the provisions of this act shall apply to any proceeding filed pursuant to § 56-585.1 or 56-585.2 of the Code of Virginia on or after January 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, c. 2, cl. 3 provides: “That an electric utility’s fair combined rate of return on equity as approved by the State Corporation Commission in the utility’s last biennial review proceeding prior to January 1, 2013, shall remain in effect for the
purposes of reviewing the utility’s test period earnings under the provisions of this act in such utility’s first biennial review proceeding to occur after January 1, 2013.”

Acts 2016, c. 3, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

Acts 2016, c. 3, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any petition or application filed before the State Corporation Commission on or after July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2016, cc. 255 and 517, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall evaluate the establishment of uniform protocols for measuring, verifying, validating, and reporting the impacts of energy efficiency measures
implemented by investor-owned electric utilities providing retail electric utility service in the Commonwealth and the establishment of a methodology for estimating annual kilowatt savings and a formula to calculate the levelized cost
of saved energy for such energy efficiency measures. The Commission shall promptly commence such evaluation following the effective date of this act and shall receive input from interested parties and the Department of Mines, Minerals
and Energy. The Commission shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations by December 1, 2016.”

Acts 2017, c. 564, cl. 2 provides: “Prior to January 1, 2020, no utility shall file a petition with the State Corporation Commission seeking a rate adjustment clause for recovery of the costs pursuant to clause (iii) of § 56-585.1.A (6) of any system
or equipment upgrade, system or equipment replacement, or other cost reasonably appropriate to extend the combined operating license for or the operating life of one or more generation facilities utilizing nuclear power.”

Acts 2017, c. 564, cl. 3 provides: “No costs recovered through the utility’s rates for generation and distribution services as of January 1, 2017 that are associated with a utility’s existing generation facilities utilizing nuclear power shall be eligible
for recovery under clause (iii) of § 56-585.1.A (6).”

Acts 2017, c. 583, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities on or after January 1, 2017.”

Acts 2018, cc. 206 and 232, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Counties of Buchanan, Dickenson, Lee, Russell, Scott, Tazewell, and Wise, and the City of Norton shall enter into a revenue sharing agreement pursuant to the provisions of §

15.2-1301

of the Code of Virginia, for any electric storage or generation facility constructed pursuant to clause (v) of subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia whereby the host locality’s revenue from such facility
shall be distributed to the other localities on the basis of the following formula: Each respective locality shall receive a percentage of the revenue as follows: (i) 16 percent each for the Counties of Tazewell and Wise; (ii) 12 percent
each for the Counties of Buchanan, Lee, Russell, and Scott; (iii) 10 percent for Dickenson County; and (iv) four percent for the City of Norton. In addition, the host locality shall receive an additional share of six percent. The agreement
shall provide that any direct costs of infrastructure improvements incurred by the host locality for purposes of the facility shall be allocated among the localities in the same proportion as the revenues from the facility. Notwithstanding
the provisions of subsection A of §

15.2-1301

, the term of such an agreement shall be perpetual.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 3 provides: “That after July 1, 2018, each Phase I Utility as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia shall not recover from customers $10 million of incurred fuel costs, and the State Corporation Commission
shall implement at the time of the utility’s next fuel cost recovery proceeding conducted pursuant to § 56-249.6 of the Code of Virginia reductions in the fuel factor rate of the Phase I Utility to reflect the nonrecovery of such fuel
expense as well as any change in the fuel factor associated with the Phase I Utility’s fuel recovery balance for the 2017-2018 fuel year and projected fuel expense for the 2018-2019 fuel year. Such nonrecovery shall not be included
in any earnings test after July 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 4 provides: “That, no later than 30 days following July 1, 2018, each Phase II Utility as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia shall provide to its current customers a one-time, voluntary generation and
distribution services bill credit, to be allocated on a historic test period energy usage basis, in an aggregate amount of $133 million. Such one-time voluntary generation and distribution services bill credit shall not be included
in any earnings test after July 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 5 provides: “That, no later than 30 days after January 1, 2019, each Phase II Utility shall provide to its current customers a one-time, voluntary generation and distribution services bill credit, to be allocated on a historic test
period energy usage basis, in an aggregate amount of $67 million, which one-time voluntary generation and distribution services bill credit shall be included in the earnings test for the utility in its first triennial review after
January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 6 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall implement adjustments in the rates for generation and distribution services of incumbent electric utilities, as defined in § 56-576 of the Code of Virginia, effective April
1, 2019, to reflect the actual annual reductions in corporate income taxes to be paid by such utilities pursuant to the provisions of the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (P.L. 115-97) and as of the effective date of such act.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 7 provides: “That in advance of the determination of the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) as to rate reductions to reflect reductions in corporate income taxes pursuant to the sixth enactment of this act, any (i) Phase
I Utility as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia shall reduce its existing rates for generation and distribution services on an interim basis, within 30 days of July 1, 2018, in an amount sufficient to
reduce its annual revenues from such rates by an aggregate amount of $50 million and (ii) Phase II Utility as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia shall reduce its existing rates for generation and distribution
services on an interim basis, within 30 days of July 1, 2018, in an amount sufficient to reduce its annual revenues from such rates by an aggregate amount of $125 million. The amount of such interim reduction in rates for generation
and distribution services shall be attributable to reductions in the corporate income tax obligations of the utility pursuant to the provisions of the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (P.L. 115-97). In implementing any further
reductions to the rates for generation and distribution services of any Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility effective April 1, 2019, pursuant to the sixth enactment of this act, the Commission shall consider this interim revenue requirement
reduction, and its actions shall be limited to a true-up of this interim reduction amount to the actual annual reduction in corporate tax obligations of such utility as of the effective date of the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of
2017 (P.L. 115-97).”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 8 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending and reenacting § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia by adding subdivision A 8 d shall expire on July 1, 2028.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 11 provides: “That any individual nonresidential retail customer of a Phase II Utility, as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, whose single account demand during the most recent calendar year exceeded
500 kilowatts but did not exceed one percent of the Phase II Utility’s peak load during the most recent calendar year, unless such customer had noncoincident peak demand in excess of 90 megawatts in calendar year 2006 or any year thereafter,
and that is currently taking service from the Phase II Utility pursuant to an approved tariff rate schedule applicable to large general service customers, not to include any customer taking service under any experimental or pilot program
tariff rate schedule, tariff rate schedule for market-based rates, tariff rate schedule to purchase 100 percent renewable energy pursuant to subdivision A 5 of § 56-577 of the Code of Virginia, or companion tariff rate schedule, that
enters into an exclusive supply agreement with the Phase II Utility whereby the customer agrees to purchase electric energy exclusively from the Phase II Utility serving the exclusive service territory in which such retail customer
is located for a period of three years or more shall be eligible for a Manufacturing and Commercial Competitiveness Retention Credit during the duration of such exclusive supply agreement, which shall reduce the base generation charges
under the customer’s existing approved tariff rate by a total of two percent.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 12 provides: “That any Phase II Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall consider in its integrated resource plan next filed after July 1, 2018, either as a demand-side energy
efficiency measure or a supply-side generation alternative, whether the construction or purchase of one or more generation facilities with at least one megawatt of generating capacity, having a measurable aggregate rated capacity of
200 megawatts by 2024, that use combined heat and power or waste heat to power and are located in the Commonwealth, are in the customer interest. For purposes of this analysis, the total efficiency, including the use of thermal energy,
for eligible combined heat and power facilities must meet or exceed 65 percent (Lower Heating Value). The assumed efficiency of waste heat to power systems that do not burn any supplemental fuel and use only waste heat as a fuel source
is 100 percent. As used in this enactment, “waste heat to power” means a system that generates electricity through the recovery of a qualified waste heat resource and “qualified waste heat resource” means (i) exhaust heat or flared
gas from an industrial process that does not have, as its primary purpose, the production of electricity and (ii) a pressure drop in any gas for an industrial or commercial process.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 13 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate the feasibility of providing broadband Internet services using
utility distribution and transmission infrastructure. Such investigation shall include determination of regulatory barriers to such services and proposed legislation to address such barriers. The State Corporation Commission shall
assist each such utility in its determination of such barriers and development of proposed legislation. Each such utility shall evaluate whether it is in the public interest and the interest of the utility (i) to make improvements
to the distribution grid in furtherance of providing such broadband Internet services in conjunction with its program of electric distribution grid transformation projects; (ii) to operate broadband Internet services using utility
distribution and transmission infrastructure to provide broadband Internet services to unserved areas of the Commonwealth; or (iii) to permit a commercial entity to lease such capacity to provide broadband Internet services to unserved
areas of the Commonwealth. Each such utility shall report whether it determines such broadband Internet services using utility distribution and transmission infrastructure to be feasible, including the maturity of the technology, the
compatibility of such services with existing electric services, the financial requirements to undertake such broadband Internet services, and those unserved areas in the Commonwealth where the provision of such broadband Internet services
appears feasible, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, the Broadband Advisory Council, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor by December 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 16 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate and report upon its economic development activities and assistance
provided to Virginia localities in the area of economic development in each utility’s respective service area. Such report shall include discussion of any existing economic rate incentives, the use thereof, and recommendations for
changes of such economic rate incentives, if any; any electrical equipment discounts for economic development purposes; any ongoing support for the development of new economic development sites, including determining the energy infrastructure
and permitting requirements in advance of an end-user locating on the site, and providing marketing assistance and promotion of validated sites; any direct assistance to localities in their economic development efforts, including responses
to requests for information and proposals for economic development prospects; and any resources and personnel devoted to such economic development efforts. The report shall include a discussion of underserved areas, particularly in
rural areas of the Commonwealth, together with suggestions for enhancing economic development assistance in such rural areas. The report shall also provide recommendations for the enhancement of economic development activities in each
utility’s respective service area, including a discussion of requirements to provide electric services to business-ready sites in advance of identifying a user for such sites. Each utility shall report to the Governor, the State Corporation
Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees on December 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 17 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate potential improvements to the net energy metering programs
as provided under § 56-594 of the Code of Virginia, potential improvements to the pilot programs for community solar development as provided under § 56-585.1:3 of the Code of Virginia, expansion of options for customers with corporate
clean energy procurement targets, and impediments to the siting of new renewable energy projects. Each such utility shall include interested stakeholders in the investigation of such issues and the development of proposed legislation
and shall issue a report of its findings to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor by November 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 18 provides: “That as part of its integrated resource plans filed between 2019 and 2028, any Phase II Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall incorporate into its long-term
plan for energy efficiency measures policy goals of reduction in customer bills, particularly for low-income, elderly, veterans, and disabled customers; reduction in emissions; and reduction in the utility’s carbon intensity. Considerations
shall include analysis of the following: energy efficiency programs for low-income customers in alignment with billing and credit practices; energy efficiency programs that reflect policies and regulations related to customers with
serious medical conditions; programs specifically focused on low-income customers, occupants of multifamily housing, veterans, elderly, and disabled customers; options for combining distributed generation, energy storage, and energy
efficiency for residential and small business customers; the extent that electricity rates account for the amount of customer electricity bills in the Commonwealth and how such extent in the Commonwealth compares with such extent in
other states, including a comparison of the average retail electricity price per kWh by rate class among all 50 states and an analysis of each state’s primary fuel sources for electricity generation, accounting for energy efficiency,
heating source, cooling load, housing size, and other relevant factors; and other issues as may seem appropriate.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 21 provides: “That on or before July 1, 2028, subject to the approval of the State Corporation Commission (the Commission), a Phase I Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall
construct or acquire a generation facility or facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight with an aggregate capacity of not less than 200 megawatts located in the Commonwealth, which utility-owned generation facility or facilities
is in the public interest as is set forth in this act. If a Phase I Utility serves in more than one jurisdiction, and a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth denies the Phase I Utility recovery of the costs of the generation facility
or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight allocated to that jurisdiction, the Phase I Utility can recover all of the costs of the generation facility or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight from its Virginia jurisdictional
customers, and all attributes of the generation facility or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight, including energy and capacity shall be assigned to Virginia.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 22 provides: “That from July 1, 2018, until July 1, 2028, not more than one-half of the combined capital investment amount attributable to (i) investments in new utility-owned generation facilities utilizing energy derived from
sunlight or from wind; (ii) investments in electric distribution grid transformation projects; (iii) investments in one or more new underground facilities to replace one or more existing overhead distribution facilities of 69 kilovolts
or less located within the Commonwealth; (iv) investment in the estimated additional cost of placing the two proposed pilot projects for the construction of qualifying electrical transmission lines of 230 kilovolts or less (but greater
than 69 kilovolts) in whole or in part underground, in excess of the cost of placing the same lines overhead, assuming accepted industry standards for undergrounding to ensure safety and reliability; and (v) the projected costs for
the utility to design, implement and operate energy efficiency programs, including a margin to be recovered on operating expenses, submitted to the Commission for approval, shall be (a) investments in one or more new underground facilities
to replace one or more existing overhead distribution facilities of 69 kilovolts or less located within the Commonwealth; (b) investment in the estimated additional cost of placing the two proposed pilot projects for the construction
of qualifying electrical transmission lines of 230 kilovolts or less (but greater than 69 kilovolts) in whole or in part underground in excess of the cost of placing the same line overhead, assuming accepted industry standards for
undergrounding to ensure safety and reliability; and (c) electric distribution grid transformation projects solely designed for physical security at distribution substations.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 23 provides: “That within 60 days after the conclusion of each triennial review proceeding conducted pursuant to § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall submit a report to the
Governor and the General Assembly and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees describing and quantifying all investments made by the utility during the test period or periods under review in both (i) new
utility-owned generation facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight or from onshore or offshore wind and (ii) electric distribution grid transformation projects, as determined by the utility’s plant in service and construction
work in progress balances related to such investments as recorded per books by the utility for financial reporting purposes as of the end of the most recent test period under review. The Commission’s report shall include, but not be
limited to, an analysis of the financial effects of such investments, including the effects on customer rates, customer bill credits, and the earnings and rate base of each utility subject to the triennial review provisions of § 56-585.1.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

Acts 2019, c. 535, cl. 3 provides: “That a utility consumer services cooperative organized pursuant to Chapter 9.1 ( § 56-231.15 et seq.) of Title 56 of the Code of Virginia may, but shall not be required to, conduct a pilot program on the same basis
as an investor-owned utility that is a Pilot Utility pursuant to the second enactment of this act by filing an appropriate application or petition before the Commission. Should such a petition or application be filed by a cooperative,
the cooperative may recover its costs pursuant to a rate adjustment clause approved by the Commission in subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. For purposes of this act only, a cooperative shall
be subject to the provisions of subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, insofar as they relate to infrastructure for business parks.”

Acts 2019, c. 535, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on December 31, 2023. The expiration of this act shall not affect the cost recovery of constructing a transmission facility that is commenced prior to such date as part of
a pilot program conducted pursuant to the second or third enactment of this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 662 was codified as subsection E of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 9 provides: “That nothing in this act shall require the utilities or the State Corporation Commission to take any action that, in the State Corporation Commission’s discretion and after consideration of all in-state and
regional transmission entity resources, threatens the reliability or security of electric service to the utility’s customers.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 12 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall issue its final order in the Percentage of Income Payment Program (PIPP) proceeding established pursuant to § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this
act, by December 31, 2020, provided that the non-bypassable universal service fee shall not be collected from customers of a Phase I or a Phase II Utility, as those terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of
Virginia, as amended by this act, until such time as the PIPP is established. The Department of Housing and Community Development and the Department of Social Services shall convene a stakeholder working group and develop recommendations
regarding the implementation of PIPP. Such recommendations shall allow for a utility to reimburse the administrative costs of the PIPP, not to exceed $3 million, and shall be submitted to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor
and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

Acts 2020, cs. 1219 and 1280, cl. 2 provides: “That the costs of allowances purchased through a market-based trading program consistent with the provisions of Article 4 ( § 10.1-1329 et seq.) of Chapter 13 of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia as added
by this act are deemed to constitute environmental compliance project costs that may be recovered by a Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility, as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, pursuant to subdivision
A 5 e of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268, cl. 1, § 1 provides:

“§ 1. It is the policy of the Commonwealth that transportation electrification will reduce dependence on petroleum, improve air quality and public health, reduce vehicle fueling costs, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases from the transportation sector.
To achieve these goals, among other steps, it is necessary to ensure there is adequate electric vehicle charging infrastructure deployed throughout the Commonwealth. It is further the policy of the Commonwealth to promote, to the greatest
extent possible, private competition and investment in transportation electrification and to enable public utilities and the public sector to complement such private investment where most effective.

“Therefore, the State Corporation Commission (Commission) shall submit a report to the General Assembly, no later than May 1, 2022, recommending policy proposals that could govern public electric utility programs to accelerate widespread transportation
electrification in the Commonwealth. To guide policy proposal development, the Commission shall utilize a public process, in which the Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy,
the Department of Transportation, and appropriate stakeholders shall participate. The Commission shall identify and retain a third-party facilitator with expertise in transportation electrification to facilitate such public process.

“In developing its policy recommendations, the Commission shall evaluate, among other things:

“1. Areas where utility or other public investment may best complement private efforts to effectively deploy charging infrastructure, with particular focus on low-income, minority, and rural communities;

“2. How smart growth policies can complement and enhance the Commonwealth’s transportation electrification goals; and

“3. How utility programs, investments, or incentives to customers or third parties to facilitate the deployment of charging infrastructure and related upgrades can support or enhance (i) statewide transportation electrification, including electrification
of public transit; (ii) the electrification of medium-duty and heavy-duty vehicles, school buses, vehicles at ports and airports, personal vehicles, and vehicle fleets; (iii) increased access to electric transportation and improved
air quality in low-income and medium-income communities; (iv) achievement of the energy storage targets established in subsection E of § 56-585.5 of the Code of Virginia; (v) improvements to the distribution grid or to specific sites
necessary to accommodate charging infrastructure; and (vi) customer education and outreach programs that increase awareness of such programs and the benefits of transportation electrification.

“The report shall also address whether and how transportation electrification can, under current law:

“a. Reduce total ratepayer rates and costs;

“b. Assist in grid management and more efficient use of the grid, in a manner that does not increase peak demand, through time-of-use rates, managed charging programs, vehicle-to-grid programs, or other alternative rate designs;

“c. Utilize increased generation from renewable energy resources; and

“d. Reduce fueling costs for vehicles.

“To the extent that the Commission and stakeholders conclude that transportation electrification cannot currently deliver these benefits, then the report shall include recommendations on how public policy can change in order to do so.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268, cl. 1, § 2 was codified as § 56-585.1:13.

Effective October 1, 2021, “ §

45.2-1600
